Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.440

Transfer of system from county to water-sewer district—Decree by superior court.

If the superior court finds that the transfer agreement authorized by RCW 36.94.410 is legally correct and that the interests of the owners of related indebtedness are protected, then the court by decree shall direct that the transfer be accomplished in accordance with the agreement.

[ 1984 c 147 s 4.]